Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3125.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-3 of the General Laws entitled "Regulatory Powers of
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-3-37.4. Informational notice on gas bills -- Gas distribution company.
(a) Every gas distribution company that shall charge for the distribution of natural gas to
any house, building, tenement, or estate shall conspicuously display upon the bill or statement for
any customer the following information:
(1) The total number of therms consumed;
(2) The total cost of distributing the gas to the customer;
(3) The customer charge;
(4) Conservation costs;
(5) All applicable credits;
(6) Charges that support low-income gas customers;
(7) Applicable taxes; and
(8) All other costs, charges, or fees added to the bill or statement.
(b) The gas distribution company shall issue a single bill for gas service to all customers in
its service territory.
(c) For purposes of this section, "conspicuously display" means including a visual
illustration showing each component of the utility bill and the cost associated with each component

including, but not limited to, supply, distribution, ratepayer funded programs and policy, taxes and
all other costs. The gas distribution company shall consult with the division in the development of
the bill format.
(d) Any utility bill that requires a revision to comply with the provisions of this section
may be implemented no later than three (3) years following the passage of this act; provided further,
a temporary version of the utility bill with the conspicuous display shall be implemented no later
than six (6) months following the passage of this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006143/SUB A/2
========
LC006143/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 3